Title
Review for Pulp Fiction (1994)
Number of Reviews
25

Author
Nizam Ahmed
     Don't believe the hype.  Quentin Tarantino's loud, brash and
supercool crime pic is certainly entertaining and a real crowd-pleaser,
but no way is the cult reputatation that has built up around it
deserved.
     Tarantino is now being hailed as the catalyst of a new wave of
motion picture director: cine-literate, streetwise and able to meld the
best elements of popular culture with the film-making craft of the
auteurs.  Erm, excuse me, but hasn't his been said about every new
"shining star" whenever a debut feature is critically acclaimed? Making
entertaining, violent films is certainly not a monopoly for Tarantino:
the Joel Silver bandwagon has been doing exactly that throughout the
eighties.  Having a grip on popular culture is also hardly a great
achievement.  Is there some reason why mentioning McDonalds and Pop
Tarts in a script makes it suddenly profound? Worst of all, a band of
pseudo-intellectuals obviously weened on the MODERN REVIEW, Julie
Burchill and Tony Parsons, have acclaimed it as a masterpiece.
Hypocritically, they heap abuse on FORREST GUMP for being too populist,
yet PULP FICTION only exists to please a slightly-more-cynical market
segment.
     Right from the start, Tarantino throws every movie trick in the
book at you.  Hey, let's start with a scene from the end of the film,
and muddle up the time sequence of the stories--the senile film
reviewers love all that stuff!  Let's have nice, slow camera movements
and an anally retentive ultra-detailed look at everything our two
hitmen protagonists get up to.  They spend seemingly hours in the car
on the way to their first job, spouting their supposedly brilliantly
witty dialogue.  It seems to have been overlooked that half this
dialogue is muffled and is barely audible, and the other half is not
particularly amusing or interesting anyway.  One particularly dull
sequence involves boxer Butch (Bruce Willis) dressing, talking to his
partner.  So what?  Why should the audience be in the slightest bit
interested in the boring chatter of Butch and Fabienne, or in Butch's
dress sense? The film is peppered with these long, drawn-out showcases
for Mr Tarantino's god-like gift for dialogue....
     There *is* fun to be had however.  Tarantino's overblown
pretentious directing style is extremely annoying, he seems to believe
the press he has been receiving, which as we all know signals the death
of talent.  The essential storylines are good, simple tales with plenty
of black humour for those with sick minds.  The entire cast performs
well, signifying one of Tarantino's rare strengths, coaxing good
performances from everyone on set.  Samuel L. Jackson and John
Travolta shine as Jules and Vince.  There are enough gunshots, fights
and blood to please all action-lovers, and a supreme scene of
humiliation and then revenge involving Butch and Mr. Big Marsellus in
a hee-haw gunshop.  The final sequence is not as powerful as Tarantino
would want, but there is certainly plenty of fun on the way.
     So no way is this An Artistic Triumph, or indeed, one of the best
films of the 90's.  It is simply an entertainment that provides its
fair share of laughs, groans and cheers, but has ideas above it's
station: a "pulp" film as the title suggests that thinks it can become
a "classic."  Sadly, it can't, and Quentin Tarantino's attempts to hide
its flaws through quirkiness and a 90's feel, while fooling many
people, left me unsatisfied.

Author
Chad Polenz
**** (out of 4 = excellent)
1994, R, 154 minutes [2 hours, 34 minutes]
[crime/satire]
starring: John Travolta (Vincent Vega), Samuel L. Jackson (Jules Winfield),
Bruce Willis (Butch Coolidge), Uma Thurman (Mia Wallace), produced by
Lawrence Bender, written by Quentin Tarantino, Roger Avary, directed by
Quentin Tarantino.
"Pulp Fiction" is such a landmark film it's difficult to describe the many
nuances and offbeat elements that make it great. It's greatness lies in the
fact that right from the get-go it establishes an entirely different, yet
completely plausible reality.
The title refers to those old cheap magazines not unlike comic books that
tell stories of "lurid subject matter," and that is exactly what we get here.
>From the basic plots and stories, to the characters' dialogue, to the
individual props, and the way they all work together to create such an
uncanny story.
As the film opens we see a seemingly normal couple having breakfast in a
coffee shop. We realize they are robbers complaining about their "job" and
it's funny not only because of the dialogue, but because it's relatable even
though the characters are not. They decide to rob the restaurant and the tone
of the film is set from this short scene alone.
The film then cuts to a different setting as we again eavesdrop on another
strange conversation, this time between two men describing the funny
differences between Europe and America. We later learn their names are
Vincent (Travolta) and Jules (Jackson) and they are hitmen about to go to
"work" themselves. But this is no ordinary crime film, and what we get is so
offbeat, "pulp" is really the only way to describe it.
As Vincent and Jules walk to their destination they start an interesting
conversation about their mob boss and his wife. This subject then leads to a
hilarious discussion about the differences between foot massages and oral
sex. Although the dialogue is laced with profanity and the overall basis of
the conversation (and the film as a whole) is taboo in nature, the way
everything is depicted is genius because it's so original and fascinating.
Since this film is a modern day pulp magazine it is not a linear story, but
a collection of at least three different ones that come together as a whole.
Tarantino's script is not so much concerned with overcoming a conflict as it
is showing how the characters affect each other. 
After Vincent and Jules do their work, we then follow Vincent as he takes
his boss's wife, Mia (Thurman), out to dinner. Their night out becomes
something very bizarre, yet totally believable all along. It flirts with
disaster but the brilliant satirical mood keeps it funny and interesting, and
(gasp!) also starts to convey a theme.
Basically, the film is about salvation and justice where you'd least expect
to find it. Vincent and Mia narrowly escape death, and a similar theme of
redemption is portrayed when Butch Coolidge (Willis), a struggling boxer,
disobeys the mob boss Marselius Wallace (Ving Rhames), and through a series
of undescribable events, the two must work together to save themselves from a
common, twisted enemy.
The ending itself comes full circle back to the beginning which could be and
probably is reflective of some kind of spiritual philosophy of "The Circle of
Life."
Everything that could be great about "Pulp Fiction" is: the acting; the
story; the offbeat, funny dialogue; and especially the film's ability to be
so complex and profound yet so interesting and easy to follow. 
Please visit Chad'z Movie Page @ http://members.aol.com/ChadPolenz

Author
Jeff Pidgeon
     If you're pressed for time, I'll start by saying that PULP
FICTION is the only one of the three that I recommend.  It has many of
the classic Tarantino trademarks--the climactic multi-pistoled
stalemate, the period pop soundtrack, the multitude of junk-culture
references both verbal and visual, a clever sense of story structure,
and of course ... the violence.
     The level of on-screen violence is up a little from RESERVOIR
DOGS, but in general I didn't feel that it was a gratuitously violent
film, as I did with NATURAL BORN KILLERS or TOTAL RECALL.  In
general, the level is about what you would expect of a "hard-R" film
these days, although there are two se- quences--one involving a pawn
shop, another an accidental overdose--that I don't think anyone
(whether they like the film or not) will forget anytime soon.  I
recommend talking to a few viewers if you're unsure ... if you can trust
them not to reveal plot points.
     PULP FICTION is a three-part story, each of the parts working
their way back together (to a degree) towards the finish.  As with
RESERVOIR DOGS.  I really enjoy how Tarantino messes with flashback and
foreward to achieve some interesting results.  This is used more
effectively in RESERVOIR DOGS, but it works well again here.  It's also
surprising how Tarantino keeps PULP FICTION from seeming stale in spite
of the many similarities with his first film.  The characters and
situations are consistently amusing or tense (or both).  The dialogue,
if a bit larded with pop culture references, is clever and entertaining
(one of my favorite things about Tarantino films is the small talk).
The performances are strong across the board--Bruce Willis is fine even
if he is leaning on his washed-up-fill-in-occupation-of-your-choice
thing.  Delivery and timing of dialog is great, with more quotable
lines in a single screenplay than I've heard in a long time.
Particlarly strong is Samuel Jackson, who seems delighted to be away
from JUASSIC PARK.  The running time (2:40) is long, but it comes just
shy of wearing out its welcome--I came out well sated, but not fed up.
The surf-pop score supports the film nicely and gives it an additional
energy to add to the, uh, fun.  A minus is the constant stream of
racial epithets, which made me uncomfortable after a while.  One might
come out of this wishing that Tarantino would knock off the Madonna
lines and do something a little more mature.  Hey, give him time.
Hopefully, he's got a whole career ahead of him.  Recommended.

Author
Jon A. Webb
     PULP FICTION is a fun film with rich philosophical undertones.
Much has been made of its violence, but here the violence plays only a
secondary role (unlike, say, NATURAL BORN KILLERS.)  Only a blue-nose
could find this film anything but funny.
     I am reminded of a play which I know only from the title and a
very brief description: ROSENCRANTZ AND GUILDENSTERN ARE DEAD.  This
takes the minor characters from HAMLET and makes them the central
figures; it turns out they have a lot of interesting things to say.
     The Rosencrantz and Guildenstern characters here are two mob hit
men played by John Travolta and Samuel L. Jackson.  They work their way
through murders, discussing philosophy and religion.  Travolta's
character has a remarkable knack for pursuing an argument to its
logical conclusion, like a philosophy professor; Jackson's character,
however, comes closer to the real point of the movie.
     The point of the movie is the manipulation of these people's lives
by God.  Some are miraculously saved; others are killed through
arbitrary accidents.  Characters meet each other accidentally, leading
to incredible confrontations; they are momentarily inattentive and
die.  In the face of these manipulations some, through strong
character, achieve control over these events and end up going
toe-to-toe with God in influencing the story.
     The real god in this movie is the playwright and director, Quentin
Tarentino, of course.  He shows up in a cute vignette as the wimpy
put-upon friend of Jackson's character.
     There are a number of good performances here.  The most amazing is
that of John Travolta, who has perhaps never been given proper credit
for his earlier roles, where he may have been acting much more than
people realized.  Certainly his character here is complex and deeply
felt.
     Samuel L. Jackson establishes himself here as being able to play a
straight, solid, serious character, which must help him in the future.
After the madness of JUNGLE FEVER and this, he's shown he can play
quite a range of types with great force.
     As always I'm amazed by Bruce Willis's appeal.  He plays the same
character here as always--strong, wise-cracking, etc.--good as ever
if you like him. (Though I don't; I'm always reminded of the "Saturday
Night Live" skit where the truth comes out--he made a deal with the
devil.)
     Uma Thurman plays a role that seems to have been written for
Winona Ryder.  Certainly she looks quite a bit like her, and her
character is more Ryder-esque than Thurman-esque.  She's not bad at it,
but I don't think she added a lot to the role.
     Maria de Medeiros has a sweet and memorable role as Bruce Willis's
girlfriend.  She's quite appealing, and I look forward to seeing her
expand on this character in the future.
     Harvey Keitel plays a somewhat expanded version of his character
from POINT OF NO RETURN.  Here he talks more and has more class (he's
wearing a tux at 8:30 in the morning.)  Nice, but nothing new.
     Eric Stoltz is great as the drug dealer--his panic, etc., is great
comedy.
     Roseanne Arquette does a brief turn as his wife; the glee that
crosses her face in the piercing scene is worth a good fraction of the
price of admission.
     I really liked Christopher Walken's scene.  It's nothing he hasn't
done before, but the story is perfectly told, and the choice of Walken
is just perfect.
     Amanda Plummer goes a little farther into madness this time.  I
see her as getting increasingly typecast, and I feel sorry for her
since I think she has much greater range than she's being given a
chance to exhibit,

Author
Mark R. Leeper
          Capsule review:  What would you get if Robert
     Altman tried to do a super-violent crime film, a cross
     between SHORT CUTS and SCARFACE?  Quentin Tarantino
     tells a weird collection of inter-connected crime
     stories peopled by a weirder collection of thugs than
     Damon Runyan could have imagined on drugs.  This is a
     film with comedy, heavy violence, some terrific
     dialogue, and a whole lot of entertainment.  Rating:
     high +2 (-4 to +4)
     At the heart of it all is Marsellus Wallace (played by Ving
Rhames), a Los Angeles crime lord who employs two vicious hitmen, Vince
and Jules (John Travolta and Samuel L. Jackson).  The hitmen are on an
errand for Marsellus, killing some young hoods who tried to steal from
Marsellus.  Their conversation is disarming as they discuss how fast
food restaurants are different in Europe and what a "TV pilot" is.
They also talk about Marsellus's wife Mia (Uma Thurman) and what the
crimelord did to someone who gave her a foot massage.  It starts likea
normal job for the two hoods, but it will not be a normal day and
thereby hangs a tale.  Meanwhile super-jealous Marsellus is planning to
ask Vince to look after Mia for a few days while the crime lord is away
on business.  But things are not going to happen like Marsellus plans
and thereby hangs another tale.  At the same time,  the crime lord is
planning to buy off an aging prizefighter, Butch (Bruce Willis), and to
have a fight fixed.  Marsellus is not just in for a surprise, but
genuinely the shock of his life.  And thereby hangs yet another tale.
Harvey Keitel has a terrific little piece proving that an expert
janitor can have more prestige than a hired gun.
     This is a film with some of the weirdest and perhaps among the
most engaging criminals ever put on film.  Tarantino has a real talent
for creating interesting characters and situations, and even for how to
set up a scene so that the audience is constantly seeing the
unexpected.  Even when the plot slows down, as it does during Vince's
night out baby-sitting, the film never bogs down.
     Tarantino, who authored the script based on stories he co-wrote
with Roger Avary, has chosen to tell those stories out of chronological
order.  That throws the viewer a little off balance, but never to the
detriment of the story-telling.  Many scenes are familiar, but
Tarantino makes us see them with a fresh eye.  Whan a character shoots
up with heroin, we have a close-up on the hypodermic with red blood
swirling into the colorless heroin solution before it is injected.  A
visit to a chic hamburger restaurant is a setpiece recreating 1950s
culture.  A taxi ride appears just a little strange until the viewer
realizes everything seen out of the windows of the cab is in black and
white.
     Tarantino has given us a film that is fresh and funny.  It is
peopled with some of the weirdest characters we have seen on film in
quite a while.  It will be interesting to see if he can please both
fans of his ultra-violent action films and a wider audience looking for
interesting stories.  If you do not object to the violence this is a
most rewarding films with authentic horror, action, and characters of
some depth.  I give it a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Author
David Wilcock
After his stunning debut, Resevoir Dogs, Tarintino followed it up with
four tales all interlinked with each other. Each story is well
written, well acted, and well directed. It's is one of the most clever
films out there.
The film starts with two people (Amander Plummer and Tim Roth)
discussing robbery in a restaurant, and then they rob the
restaurant.We then get to the four stories. In the first story,
Travolta and Jackson are excellent as two hitmen who have to kill some
kids who haven't been following their bosses orders. It's horribly
violent, yet wickedly funny at the same time, and actually quite
scary. The second story concerns Travolta taking out the bosses wife,
played by Uma Thurman. Unfortunatley for him, she has a drug overdose,
and he has to try and get her back. Again, it's another funny story,
and well acted again. The third story concerns a boxer, Bruce Willis,
trying to get back his gold watch (although there's a lot more to it
than that), and the final story is continuing what happens at the
start of the film, with Travolta and Jackson trying to control Plummer
and Roth. It's another tense scene, still funny, but terrifying. It's
a masterpiece of direction and acting.
Of course, the film is full of swearing, extreme violence (although
not as bad as Natural Born Killers, it's a bit more violent than Dogs)
and even a bit of rape (the Deliverance way) Although not quite as
'gritty' as Dogs, the violence is still shocking. It's played more for
laughs though, and, of course, it's full of Tarintino's witty
dialouge. The film looks really good, especially the diner where
Thurman takes Travolta. There's a fantastic soundtrack running
throughout. This film has all the hallmarks of a classic. Naturally,
it was totally ignored by the OSCARS, but did win the Palme D'or at
Cannes. Be warned though, this film is not for the faint of heart, and
is not really a good film to show the kids either. But overall, this
is a brilliant, witty, violent masterpiece. Rent it out now!

Author
Michael J. Legeros
     Quentin Tarantino's follow-up to RESERVOIR DOGS is a brilliantly
funny series of sketches about professional criminals and their
miraculous second chances.  No sophomore slump here; PULP FICTION is a
shoo-in for sanction among critical and commercial audiences alike.
     The stories number four and go something like this: two lovers
(Amanda Plummer and Tim Roth) want to switch from heisting liquor
stores to robbing restaurants.  Meanwhile, a hitman named Vincent
(Travolta) has been ordered to take the boss's wife (Uma Thurman) out
to dinner.  Meanwhile, boxer Butch Coolidge (Willis) has been ordered
to take a dive in fifth.  Meanwhile, Vincent and his partner Jules
(Samuel L. Jackson) have to clean-up the mess from a "bad hit."  Got
it?
     Said stories are presented both separately and out of order, and
the effect actually strengthens the suspense.  All is made clear in the
last hour, but, until then, the viewer is lured into a lurid limbo
where no one--either in the audience or on-screen--can even *imagine*
what's going to happen next.
     While the direction is good, very good, nothing sizzles like the
script.  Tarantino's prose overflows with some of the richest (and most
unprintable) dialogue of the decade.  Punctuating the obscenities are
pop references of every sort; from Madonna (of course) to "Le" Big
Mac.
     You could quibble on a couple points, such as the length of the
third segment.  But, oh those stories!  Here is a world where even the
smallest detail--such as the unavailability of a "balloon"--can
mushroom into the most catastrophic of consequences.  The violent
unpredictability of the Tarantino universe has never been more brutal.
     With two exceptions, the ensemble is exceptional.  PULP FICTION
marks the umpteenth return of John Travolta, who gives a career
performance as the toilet-trained (don't ask) hitman Vincent Vega.  His
partner, Samuel L. Jackson, hits a higher note in the commanding role
of Jules; he's so cool, you can't take your eyes off him.
     The two sore thumbs are Willis (too loose) and Tarantino (too
stiff).  Better is Christopher Walken, who wanders through for one
scene and one delicious monologue.  He's almost as good as Harvey
Keitel, who makes an eleventh-hour appearance as the world's
best-dressed janitor.
     To those who strain to complain about the subject matter, all I
can say is, well, touche.  PULP FICTION plays for laughs rape, racism,
murder, masochism, drug overdoses, Vietnam POWs, and, even, the Bible.
If any of the aforementioned offends, then this may not be best movie
for you.
NOTE:  Film won the Best Picture award at this year's Cannes film
       festival where the director gave the finger to a detractor during
       a press conference.  Really.

Author
Thomas Skogestad
Running time:  144 minutes
MPAA rating: R (This being a Tarantino film, no extra explanation is
             necessary)
With: John Travolta, Samuel L. Jackson, Uma Thurman, Harvey Keitel,
      Bruce Willis
Written & Directed by:  Quentin Tarantino (with Roger Avary on stories)
Produced by: Lawrence Bender
Released by Miramax
Reviewed at: Landmark's California, Berkeley, CA, Oct. 14, 1994 (with a very
             enthusiastic audience)
     The film starts and ends at a coffee shop, where two petty crooks
decide to rob something no one would ever expect to be the target of a
robbery: the very coffee shop they're having breakfast in.  The movie
cuts from them just after they start their heist, and then tells three
more stories before returning to our coffee guests.  Quickly, the three
segments are about taking the boss's wife out on a date; a boxer is
forced to take a dive--and doesn't comply; and deposing of a body.
     Just because this is the order things happen in the movie, does
not mean that this is the order things are chronologically.  Tarantino
successfully juxtaposes time to pack that extra punch.
      It's like having a dinner with several different foods, some you
don't like, some you love.  Therefore you save the best for last, but
once in a while you can't restrain yourself, you need that good stuff.
But you overeat on what you don't like, so you're a bit disappointed
when you're not able to eat all that good stuff.  But when the dessert
arrives, it's like a whole new stomach opens, and you eat all the
treats that are being served.
     The movie opens wonderfully, but loses some steam after a
while.  Not to worry: Tarantino strikes back with an overwhelming
power.  Especially the last hour and a half or so, which is one long
joyride.  Just like a good book where you keep counting pages, hoping
that there's a lot left.  Alas when the end comes--after two and a half
hours--the movie is definitely over.  You just sit there begging for
more.
     Like Tarantino's debut--and one of my favorite movies--RESERVOIR
DOGS, this movie is full of references to movies and life of all kind.
     Butch the pugilist, played by Bruce Willis, plans to run off to
Knoxville, Tennessee--the same town Tarantino himself was born.
     In the Tarantino executive produced and Roger Avary directed film,
KILLING ZOE, Eric Stoltz had a major part.  Well, he's here too!
     From RESERVOIR DOGS we have Tim Roth and Harvey Keitel in major
roles, but not the same.  Keitel more or less reprises his role from
POINT OF NO RETURN.
     And from TRUE ROMANCE we have Christopher Walken, Patricia
Arquette's sister--Rosanna, and making personal decisions in a
bathroom.
     Blaxploitation, pulp, noir, Godard.  And the list goes on and
on.  Really, the movie just has to be experienced.
     Yes, the trademark Tarantino dialog and violence is also in this
movie.  While the violence is perhaps more subdued, it's more often
played for humor.  There's no resisting laughing when Travolta
accidentally (because of a bump in the road) kills a guy and his blood
and brain splatters all over the car he's in.  It might be sick, but
it's a whole lot of fun.  This might not seem restrained, but it could
be a lot more violent.
     And for those wanting S&M, don't waste your money on EXIT TO EDEN,
this movie contains a rather shocking sadomasochistic scene with Bruce
Willis and Ving Rhames (who plays the man who makes Butch take the
fall).  The build up to this scene contains a scene where the one
person you wouldn't expect to die does.  (Tip: Don't go to the bathroom
without your weapon.)
     Christopher Walken has just one scene in the movie, in which he
explains how came the family gold watch which has gotten into his
possession--and more important how it was hidden during seven years of
P.O.W. captivity.  Things like this explain why the movie is more that
just "pulp."  In a lesser movie we would have the violence, but not the
humor.  The stars would just be there for sake of a simple cameo, and
nothing more.  The plot itself might not be considered as that
original.  But that's not what makes this film interesting.  It's what
happens to the characters that make the film so great.
     I could go on about more technical matters, but I wouldn't want
you to miss the next screening of PULP FICTION.

Author
James Berardinelli
Date Released:  10/7/94 (NY, LA); 10/14/94 (elsewhere) 
Running Length:  2:29 
Rated:  R (Language, violence, mature themes) 
Starring:  John Travolta, Samuel L. Jackson, Uma Thurman, Harvey Keitel,
           Tim Roth, Amanda Plummer, Maria de Medeiros, Ving Rhames,
           Eric Stoltz, Rosanna Arquette, Christopher Walken, Bruce Willis,
           Quentin Tarantino 
Director:  Quentin Tarantino 
Producer:  Lawrence Bender 
Screenplay:  Quentin Tarantino based on stories by Quentin Tarantino 
             and Roger Avary 
Cinematography:  Andrezj Sekula 
Music:  Karyn Rachtman 
Released by Miramax Films 
Pulp (pulp) n.  1.  A soft, moist, shapeless mass of matter.  2.  A book 
containing lurid subject matter, and being characteristically printed on 
rough, unfinished paper. 
     "The path of the righteous man is beset on all sides by the
inequities of the selfish and the tyranny of evil men.  Blessed is he
who in the name of charity and goodwill shepherds the weak through the
valley of darkness, for he is truly his brother's keeper and a finder
of lost children.  And I will strike down upon thee with great
vengeance and furious anger those who attempt to poison and destroy my
brothers.  And you will know my name is the Lord when I lay my
vengeance upon thee."
          - Jules' version of Ezekiel 25:17
     The danger of having as successful and explosive a debut as
RESERVOIR DOGS is that expectations are invariably high--sometimes
unrealistically so--for the follow up.  Quentin Tarantino, however,
has managed the near-impossible:  improve upon the extraordinary.  PULP
FICTION shows what can happen when a talented and accomplished
filmmaker reaches his apex.
     This film is one wild ride.  An anthology of three interconnected
stories that take place in a modern-day Los Angeles tinted by echoes of
Dashiell Hammett and Raymond Chandler, the movie impresses in every
possible way.  Writer/director Tarantino has merged film noir with the
gangster tale and pulled them both into the '90s.  As definitive as
Francis Ford Coppola's GODFATHER saga was for the '70s, so is PULP
FICTION for today's generation.
     Some have wondered whether Tarantino can create women of strength
and independence equal to his men.  PULP FICTION supplies the answer
with a resounding affirmation.  Both sexes are rendered with similar
depth and insight.
     PULP FICTION's three tales are structured to intersect and overlap
at key points, even though they are not presented in chronological
order.  Tarantino arranges his initial scene to dovetail with his final
one in a remarkable example of closure.  Those confused by the
structure will see everything clearly once the final line is spoken.
     "Vincent Vega and Marsellus Wallace's Wife" is the first story.
It opens with Vincent (John Travolta) and Jules (Samuel L.  Jackson)
out on a hit for their boss, Marsellus (Ving Rhames).  Along the way,
Vincent confesses that he's uneasy about an upcoming job--taking out
Marsellus' young wife Mia (Uma Thurman) while the main man is out of
town.  The source of the nervousness lies in a story circulating that
Marsellus had a man thrown out a fourth story window for giving Mia a
foot massage.  One wrong step and Vincent could find himself in deep
trouble.
     "The Gold Watch" is about a boxer, Butch (Bruce Willis), who is
handsomely paid by Marsellus to throw a fight.  Only at the last moment
does it become more profitable to renege on the deal.  So, along with
his French girlfriend, Fabienne (Maria de Medeiros), Butch goes on the
run, hoping to live long enough to spend some of the fortune he has
suddenly gained.
     "The Bonnie Situation" ties together a few loose threads.  It also
introduces Harvey Keitel as a suave problem-solver named Wolf and
Quentin Tarantino as Jim, a man worried that his wife will come home
from work to find a dead body in a blood-spattered car in his garage.
Sometimes, it appears, helping out Marsellus is not without its
complications.
     As was the case in RESERVOIR DOGS, Tarantino's crisp dialogue
sparkles.  The vulgarity-laced monologues and conversations ripple with
humor and are ripe with points to ponder.  Foot massages, hamburgers,
comfortable silence, a gold watch, pot bellies, divine intervention,
and filthy animals--all these and more receive the writer's attention
as he presents meaningless issues in an intensely-fascinating and
almost lyrical fashion.  Who else (except perhaps David Mamet) can make
profanity sound so poetic?
     For anyone who thought they knew the breadth of Bruce Willis' and
John Travolta's acting ability, a surprise awaits.  Whether it's an
effect of the script, the direction, or something else, these two turn
in surprisingly strong performances.  And they're not the only ones.
Uma Thurman, Rosanna Arquette, Ving Rhames, Harvey Keitel, Tim Roth,
Amanda Plummer, Eric Stoltz (who has a Tarantino-related triple play
with PULP FICTION, KILLING ZOE, and SLEEP WITH ME), and the director
himself are all excellent.  And then there's Samuel L. Jackson, who
seems to get better with every outing.  His is the standout in a sea of
standouts.
     All the details are executed to perfection.  Ironies abound in the
smallest situations.  One death is caused by, of all things, a
poptart.  And it takes a director of rare talent to find the humor in
an ugly, bloody situation.  Mixing the original with the derivative,
Tarantino pushes PULP FICTION in directions that are both anticipated
and unexpected.
     Relentless in its pace, PULP FICTION is as exhausting as it is
exhilarating.  Yet there is considerably more to this film than a SPEED
with good actors.  In between all the shootings, Mexican standoffs, and
other violent confrontations exist opportunities to explore various
facets of the human experience, including spirituality (witness Jules'
fondness for a pseudo-Ezekiel passage).  With this film, every layer
that you peel away leads to something deeper and richer.  It's a rare
film that can say that, and a rarer one that can do it in the manner
that this one has.
-James Berardinelli (blake7@cc.bellcore.com)

Author
Ben Hoffman
     The film begins and ends with Honey Bunny (Amanda Plummer) and her
guy, Pumpkin (Tim Roth), a couple of petty thieves who, after mulling
over the risks of holding up various and sundry types of retail
business and banks hit upon the bright idea of robbing the very
restaurant in which they are having breakfast.  Think of all the
wallets.   Thus begins the film which encompasses and interlaces three
stories of small-time crooks in a send up  of movies about that
gangsters.  There are more laughs than killings but with plenty of
each.
     Marsellus Wallace, (Ving Rhames), the boss, has instructed Vincent
Vega (John Travolta) to watch over his wife, Mia (Uma Thurman), while
he is away on business.  The last goon to have baby-sat Mia ended up
dead so Vincent is less than thrilled with his assignment.  Before that
is over, Vincent goes through a deadly series of frantic events which
for us, the audience, are hilarious.
     Elsewhere, there is Butch Coolidge (Bruce Willis), an upcoming
prizefighter being instructed to take a fall in his next fight.
Willis, it should be noted, is becoming more and more believable as an
actor.  In Pulp Fiction, he outdoes himself.  In this segment he is
helped by Captain Koons (Christopher Walken) who, with a straight face,
relates to Butch (as a child) the very weird story of how the captain
came into possession of a pocket watch which he is turning over to
Coolidge.  Fabienne (Maria De Medeiros) is Butch's girlfriend.
     There is still another story that threads its way through the
film.  This one involves Vincent and Jules (Samuel L Jackson).  While
Travolta is perfect as the crook who seems to get into all kinds of
trouble without looking for them, it is Jackson who runs away with the
film.  Last seen in FRESH, here he really takes over as the
Bible-quoting criminal who suddenly sees the Hand of God and wants
out.
     Harvey Keitel excels as Wolf in a short but very funny bit.  Eric
Stoltz is the drug dealer and Rosanna Arquette is his wife.
     While each of the stories is of the silly kind and what happens
now crisscrosses with what happened earlier, it all adds up to a most
enjoyable movie.
Written and Directed by Quentin Tarantino.

Author
Jerry Saravia
"Pulp Fiction" is one of the most pleasurable movies I have seen in a great
while, and it will stand as the breakthrough movie of the 90's. It is a love it
or hate it deal - either you admire the artistry of Quentin Tarantino's dark
flourishes or you detest the sickening violence and brutality inherent
throughout. Not only is the title "Pulp Fiction" a household name but so is
Quentin Tarantino, a video store clerk who never went to film school and became
an overnight success directing 1992's gory "Reservoir Dogs." All the attention
is not for naught; "Pulp Fiction" is a great film that breaks new ground, is
politically incorrect and unconventional. Tarantino has not so much reinvented
film as much as he has rejuvenated it - he has brought back the sheer joy we
all share of watching a good movie. The last time this phenomenon occurred was
with the Steven Spielberg masterpiece, "Raiders of the Lost Ark."
"Pulp Fiction" won the Golden Palm award at the Cannes Film Festival in 1994
and won the Best Original Screenplay award at the Oscars. Since the film's
release, "Pulp" has stirred great controversy over its obscenities, short
bursts of bloody violence, racist overtones, sexual abuse and rape, and
misogyny. All of these charges are largely silly because there is more violence
and misogyny in the cartoonish "True Lies" and "Forrest Gump" than in "Pulp"
(all released the same year). What upsets people is that "Pulp" is more open
and subtly honest with these issues, and because the characters only seem cold
and heartless. This is largely a falsity as you will observe. There is truth in
the film but it is mostly an exaggeration, and shouldn't be taken seriously. 
John Travolta and Samuel L. Jackson play the main characters, Vincent Vega and
Jules, two black-suited hoods who work for the big, black, bald boss Marsellus
Wallace (Ving Rhames). Vincent and Jules are on a mission to retrieve a
mysterious stolen briefcase belonging to Marsellus. Some college roommates are
in possession of the briefcase, and Jules torments and kills two of them with
his gun, but not before ranting and raving a biblical quote from "Ezekiel
25:17." 
Later, Vincent meets Marsellus's wife, Mia Wallace (Uma Thurman). He is
supposed to entertain her while the boss is away on business. They go to a 50's
diner restaurant called "Jack Rabbit Slim's" where they do the Bat dance to
Chuck Berry's "You Never Can Tell." When they come back to her house, Mia has a
heroin overdose where she is treated by an adrenaline needle to the heart
administered by Vincent at a drug dealer's house. By the way, the grungy drug
dealer is hilariously played by Eric Stoltz ("Killing Zoe"). 
Another story circulates around "The Gold Watch," and this concerns a
hot-headed boxer named Butch (Bruce Willis). He is told to throw a fight by
Marsellus (this subplot reaches as far back as "The Set-Up" and a hundred other
noirish tales). Of course, Butch does not throw the fight and kills the
opponent. He tries to flee with his French girlfriend (Mia De Medeiros) but he
won't leave without his gold watch, which he left at his apartment. When he
tries to retrieve it, he finds Vincent whom he kills without hesitation. Butch
almost gets away scot-free until he confronts Marsellus on the street - they
hit and shoot each other until they are caught and bound by S&M freaks in one
of the most thrillingly gory moments in the history of cinema. 
Then we return to the Jules and Vincent predicament involving the roommates and
the mysterious suitcase - this episode is titled "The Bonnie Situation." Jules
and Vincent kill all the roommates except for Marvin. They take Marvin along
with them, and in the car, Jules feels that their survival from death was an
act of God. Just then, Vincent accidentally blows off Marvin's head and,
needless to say, it is a bloody mess. They arrive at Jimmy's house (Jimmy is
played by Quentin Tarantino) where they store the bloody car in his garage
until Winston the Wolf (Harvey Keitel) comes by to help the boys clean up the
mess by telling how to do it. This whole sequence plays like an eerie extension
of th trunk scene from "GoodFellas." 
"Pulp Fiction" is great fun and a miraculous movie simply because it plays and
twists with the conventions of at least three different genres - the lurid
atmosphere of film noir, the standard action-oriented melodrama, and your basic
gangster crime picture. The difference is that the characters end up in bizarre
situations that aren't dictated by cliched plot points or mediocre chases.
These characters live and die by doing stupid things! Butch's stupid deed is to
get his precious gold watch back at this apartment where the killers are
inevitably waiting for him. When he arrives, there seems to be no one around.
Ah! But Vincent went to the bathroom and left his silencer on the kitchen
counter thus making it easy for Butch to blow him away!
"Pulp Fiction" has one classic scene after another and my favorite is the
extended sequence with Vincent and Mia on their date at the Jack Rabbit Slim's
restaurant where a facsimile of Buddy Holly (Steve Buscemi) is their waiter.
Their conversation consists of T.V. shows, Mia's supposed foot massage,
five-dollar milk shakes, and "think of something to say"-type language, while
they shoot frequent glances at each other. It is a delightful, entertaining and
wonderful sequence to behold. The philosophical discussions between Vincent and
Jules are also priceless, including the discussion on McDonald's hamburgers in
America versus France, and let's not forget that Jules's favorite burger is the
Big Kahuna burger. 
"Pulp Fiction" has been severely criticized for containing foul language,
gratuitous violence, and thoroughly repellent characters whom you couldn't care
less about. Firstly, the violence is not gratuitous, it is explosive and brief
(unlike some of "Reservoir Dogs" more profane passages). Secondly, these
characters are not repellent (except for the nonsensical inclusion of the Gimp)
because Tarantino shows that he cares about them by instilling them with
humanistic touches. Marsellus seems to be a one-dimensional big gangster boss
until you see the hate etched on his face when he is hideously raped by one of
the hillbillys. In fact, Butch goes back to save Marsellus from these hillbilly
freaks even though Marsellus initially wanted him killed. And look at the
conclusion of the film (which is actually the beginning) where Jules decides to
get out of the gangster business after having experienced a case of "divine
intervention," and decides he'll "walk the earth like Caine in 'Kung Fu'."
Finally, don't forget Vincent aiding Mia after a heroin overdose. The scene is
both frightening and hilarious, like most of Tarantino's masterful epic. 
Perhaps, this is Tarantino's finest hour, and he may never make another movie
quite like "Pulp Fiction." Some critics have said that he may never make a real
movie about real people in real situations dealing with real emotions. That may
be true, but "Pulp Fiction" is as real a movie as we are likely to get for
sometime. It is also one of the greatest entertainments of the 1990's.   
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Author
Jun Yan
Written and Directed by Quentin Taratino
        It's a little hard to write a capsule on Pulp Fiction, as it is
composed of several loosely connected stories tied together and cannot be
described with minimal amount of words.  The first story line is about a
couple of professional hitmen (played by John Travolta and Samuel L.
Jackson) retrieving an important suitcase for their boss while killing a
couple of young thugs who stole it.  It goes on to follow the romantic
relationship between the boss' new wife (Uma Therman) and Travolta.  It
contains a very cute dancing sequences and hilarious dialogues as well as
two subtle and fine performances.  
        Another episode involves an on-his-way-to-retirement boxer (Bruce
Willis) pulling a trick on Travolta's hitman's boss for the sake of both
money and pride.  His addventure quickly turns dark and bizzare, but he
finally gets to ride into the sunset -- debt free -- with his little
French girlfriend, thanks to his father's watch.  It is, in my opinion,
the weakest part of the whole film, because it does not feel too original
comparing to the rest of the movie.  The problem is that the plot twists
take more priority over *situations*, which is what Tarantino really
excels in, and the story, however strange it is, feels familiar and
over-the-top.  
        The third chapter is called "The Bonnie Situation," in which the
story goes back to trace the two hitmen after the retrieval of the
suitcase.  Taratino wrote himself a hilarious small role, although he
proves again he cannot act.  Just as funny is Harvey Kietel, playing
a meticulous man that helps to solve the eternal problem of how
to get rid of a bloody dead body.  The ending completes a full circle to
resolve the restaurant robbery that is described in the very beginning of
the film.  
        This is Taratino's more refined and sophisticated work comparing
to his first effort "Reservoir Dogs."  It bares his trademark of slightly
absurd dialogues in the most unlikely situations, such as a lengthy
discussion about foot massage before a killing takes place.  They are so
unreal, funny and witty that, after a while, they kind of grow on me.
It's a treat for the audience's ears. There are numerous "blocks" of
dialogues or monologues that are worth chewing on.   Except for unusual
conversations, Tarantino is best at handle a "situation" of conflicts and
complexity and the characters within the situation.  The non-linear
narrative and slightly off-centered characters are all interesting and
neat.  The cinematography reminds me of some black-and-white films from
the 40s and 50s (although I'm terribly ignorant of old movies) in which
the characters move within a frame while the camera is held steady.  The
shots are multi-layered that interesting things are displayed
simultaneously both in the front and in the background.  Things are all
cool and fun. However, I was not entirely impressed with the film for it
was not too far beyond cleverness, until the finale.  
        The ending of the restaurant robbery is the best part of Pulp
Fiction, which literally transformed the whole film to a higher level.
The true jewel is Samuel L. Jackson's conversation about faith, revelation
and redemption.  His "you approach this shit the wrong way" speech
feels more persuasive and convincing than any self-conscious religious
talk in "Contact".  His "walk the earth" intention even reaches beyond
pure christianity and shares a touch with Zen Buddism and Taoism.
Finally, Jackson's gunman becomes a preacher to talk a couple of small
robbers out of their robbery completely blows me away.  Like the ending of
"The Usual Suspect," it takes the film from ingenuity to profoundness that
is neither pretentious nor shallow.  I was truly surprised.  It was a
priceless scene and Jackson's performance delivers every drop of juice in
the script.  I don't see why he did not get nearly as much attention as
Travolta did,(Maybe he's not a good-looking white male actor who's adored
by everyone in the business?)  but Jackson's presence is truly special.
Just for the last half hour, it is worth the price to see "Pulp Fiction." 

Author
Alex Winter
     The phenomenal response to Quentin Tarantino and his film PULP
FICTION scares the crap out of me.  He's garnered the Palme D'or at
Cannes, critical success all over the world, and been hailed as a great
writer-director.  This isn't the first time that a new talent was
prematurely placed on a pedestal, nor that a film this flawed was
received with gushing fanfare.  But it's an alarming indication of how
little we have come to expect from cinema and art in general.
     The biggest problem with PULP FICTION is that it takes Tarantino
almost three hours to tell a story that not only could, but should be
mercifully shorter.  It's a moral allegory, told in vignettes, about
lowlifes who can't get their shit together.  Its theme is communicated
through Jules, a thoughtful but immoral hitman.  On a hit, Jules has an
epiphany, realizing that the power dynamic he exploits is a facade for
the spiritually bankrupt, and he gets out.  It's a good idea, and the
best films of its kind were never longer than an hour and a half.  The
length of PULP FICTION can't be blamed on its labyrinthine narrative,
which dances back and forth in time.  Kubrick's The Killing, made when
he was younger than Tarantino, is at least as intricate, juggles as
many characters and weaves its web in less than ninety minutes.
     PULP FICTION is more gratuitous and meandering than purposefully
complex.  A lot of what we see and how we see it is extraneous.  Like
an overzealous freshman writing student, Tarantino is too desperate to
please to be concise.  And with a vignette format, being concise is
essential.  He spends a half hour on a disaffected white girl,
exploring every detail of her existence, and another forty minutes on a
boxer who bungles his way through a double-cross.  The girl's plotline
makes no sense.  The boxer's story kind of fits the theme but is
short-changed by the overstuffed structure, which doesn't allow any of
the plots to be worked through.
     Tarantino's more interested in his semiotic manipulation of
movie-cliches and narrative trickery than in telling a good story.  His
depiction of Los Angeles feels like the vision of a bad Italian comic
book artist who never left Napoli.  The present-day hitmen are
inexplicably dressed like the Rat pack, the dialogue (though hilarious)
sounds more like an Eric Bogosian rant than human speech, and
everything's steeped in half-hearted symbolism about fate and destiny.
There's so much artifice and excess crammed into PULP FICTION that
Tarantino doesn't just seem disinterested in being pointed, but
terrified of it.  It's no help that the cinematography and soundmix are
so jarring that they actually cause physical pain.
     One of the film's many fans would dispute my points by saying he
enjoyed the movie, however meaningless, so why should it be cut?
That's an understandable question from someone who expects nothing from
film but a titillating puzzle, but not from Tarantino who must want
more of a reaction than that to his work.  Or does he? His decision to
tell stories this way is not just puerile and self-indulgent, it's
indicative of the over-regard for mind-games and artifice that's
plagued the art world since the arrival of Cubism.  And it's the reason
why film, our youngest and, potentially, most powerful art form, has
not evolved past the cradle.  If anything, it's regressed, simply
because we're so attached to our brain-power as an end unto itself.
What could be a dynamic medium for deep expression is mostly a
superficial tool for exercising our intellects, and only filmmakers can
change that.
     It's ironic that PULP FICTION, a perfect model of masturbatory
instead of pointed storytelling, wraps its theme around the Bible.
Jules has spent years blindly quoting Ezekial, chapter 25, which speaks
of God's wrath against the unfaithful.  When he has his epiphany, the
spiritual meaning of the verse becomes clear to him, and he's reborn.
Tarantino may want to stroll backwards in his bible a few pages to
Ecclesiastes, chapter 5: "And what profit hath he that hath labored for
the wind?" Certainly, he's gained fame, wealth and creative freedom.
But what use is that if he can't muster up faith in his own medium?
(The preceding was my article printed in the New-York-based magazine;
"Paper," December issue.  It is from my monthly film column.)

Author
Steve Rhodes
     PULP FICTION is a singular show.  The best way to describe it is
that it is as if you sit down in the movie theater and are immediately
transported to a roller coaster going full speed through a fun house of
ghoulish images.  This is complemented with one of the funniest,
smartest, and filthiest dialogs I have heard in a long time.  There is
no other movie I can compare it to.  It has the adrenaline flow of
SPEED, the intelligent dialog of MY DINNER WITH ANDRE, the violence of
the goriest part of the GODFATHER, and the comedy of TOOTSIE.  All that
having been said, it is like none of the above other than the
superficial aspects I just mentioned.
     If extreme violence (e.g., brains blown on car windows) is
something you can not endure, if 700 uses of the F word is something
you can not tolerate, if heavy drug use is something you care never to
see (cocaine is passe we learn, all of the in-gangsters now do heroin),
then do not pay your money to see PULP FICTION.
     On the other hand, all of the above really works in this show.
This is a parody of criminal life and a really funny one.  This is a
show that takes one chance after another.  John Travolta and Samuel L.
Jackson are nothing short of terrific in it.  Oscars are possible here.
They play the hit men for a major bad guy (Marsellus Wallace).  The bad
guy is also paying a boxer (Bruce Willis) to take a dive.  Harvey
Keitel plays a fixer of problems for the bad guy.  Tim Roth and Amanda
Plummer play  a couple of two-bit crooks who like robbing restaurants
because nobody else does that.  Eric Stoltz plays a low class drug
dealer and Rosanna Arquette plays his girlfriend who has rings in every
part of her anatomy (yes, there too).  Christopher Walken shows up in a
single long important scene.  Uma Thurman plays the major bad guy's
wife.  Whew, and I probably missed a lot of other people who did some
great acting.
     The major hero and the one who took the most risks in this movie
was the scriptwriter.  He was also the director - Quentin Tarantino.
The script went from funny scenes like a restaurant where all the staff
were 50s famous look-alikes to a scene where the two hit men were first
discussing what a McDonald's quarter-pounder is called in France and
why to a discussion of whether it was okay to kill someone for
massaging your wife's feet.
     This is a movie that to describe it will only make you want NOT to
go see it, yet it is mesmerizing and wonderful.  The intensity level of
the movie is off the scale.  People were laughing like crazy in the
theater and to intelligent dialog too.  Other scenes had the audience
gasping for breath and uttering out loud "oh, my god".  Several scenes
were worse the finger cutting scene in The Piano.
     The camerawork was mainly standard stuff, but there are several
scenes where it got pretty experimental.  The best example is the long
scene of Wills staring into the camera without moving while he listens
to the major bad guy, whom we have not yet seen, delivering a long
lecture.  It then switches to a view of only the back of the bad guy's
head with everything else out of focus while Willis listens for quite a
while more.
     If you can like roller coasters and if you have taken to heart my
very serious caveats at the first, then I recommend this show to you.
Do not take or let any teenager see this.  It IS too much for them.  It
is rated R, but this is certainly NC-17.  Why it did not get NC-17 I
can not figure out unless it was because the show only talks about sex
and has no naked bodies.  It runs 2:34 which is a tad long.  I think
the movie is truly unique and is perfect for its genre so I give it my
top rating of ****.  See it on a big screen with lots of folks in the
audience for maximum enjoyment.
REVIEWED WRITTEN ON: October 19, 1994
Opinions expressed are mine and not meant to reflect my employer's.

Author
Walter Frith
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
The most brilliantly written film of the 1990's so far and likely will
be all around is director and co-writer Quentin Tarantino's 1994 shock
filled masterpiece 'Pulp Fiction'.  Hilarious, violent, sexy, vibrant,
hip and many other adjectives can be used to describe this complex
character study set in Los Angeles but reflective of society everywhere.
What probably turned off a lot of people from the film was its attitude
that it was acceptable to celebrate the behaviour of lowlifes by making
the two main characters, a couple of hit men (John Travolta and Samuel
L. Jackson), a pair of unconscionable verbal trash cans who hold
philosophical debates throughout the course of killing people.  In
reality, the film is more about what backfires from that lifestyle when
one of the hit men goes down for the dirt nap at an untimely point in
the film with little sympathy.
The film tells basically two stories with sub-text thrown in for good
measure among some of the supporting players, although some have argued
that everyone in the film is a supporting player.
The first tale, about the hit men (Travolta and Jackson) details their
quest on a bright and pleasant morning to confront, recover stolen
property from and kill four small time thieves in a run down apartment
complex where hamburgers are the main breakfast.  There is a command of
character on the part of Jackson, who solidifies his authority with
quotes from the Bible and some sarcastic poking at his targets of prey,
complete with an automatic pistol.  Both Jackson and Travolta have a
hilarious exchange of words regarding the subject of foot massages and
it's only one of many scenes the film has where comic mockery of mayhem
is the norm.  The first twenty minutes of the film focuses on this
occasion and the consequences of it when they settle business and
director Tarantino returns to this messy farce for the film's final
scenes.
The second tale is that of a third rate boxer, Bruce Willis, and his
wishy-washy girlfriend and how the two of them try and take it on the
lam after Willis successfully double crosses his boss in a fight he is
supposed to throw.  Willis provides some the best work of his career as
a character with integrity shining through at the wrong time.  His past
is mirrored through an affection for his father from whom he inherited a
very special wrist watch.  Upon trying to recover the watch, he
encounters a frightening amount of nightmarish characters who want to do
him in.  The basement of a used appliance shop is the setting for the
film's most unpleasant scenes of bad taste and this is the film's only
weak spot.  The scenes involving Willis' conflict and confrontation of
the film's most unpleasant characters drags somewhat but not too much
and was the main reason, I believe, for Tarantino's return to the the
film's opening story towards the end of the film.  In case you haven't
seen 'Pulp Fiction', it's told in a very appealing and non-sequential
fashion, adding to its impact as a pulsating and stunning piece of very
American cinema.
Another piece of dialogue filled scenery is a business date between
(Travolta) and his boss' wife, (Uma Thurman).  Not romantically linked
but strangely attracted to each other in a competitive way, the two of
them burn up the screen with their personalities, indicative of the
film's most basic scenes of good taste.  The scene is filmed at a 1950's
nostalgia bar where the art direction, waiters and waitresses are decked
out in everything reminiscent of the film's opposite tone.  Travolta and
Thurman enter a dance contest at the restaurant and take home first
prize for their efforts, marred by an overdose of powerful drugs that
almost kills one of them and results in getting and antidote from the
drug's main supplier.  This is the film's most heart pounding scene that
makes light of it all and that in and of itself is repellent or
hilarious, depending on your point of view.
A very important scene in 'Pulp Fiction' is the opening montage, in
which two losers (Tim Roth and Amanda Plummer), plot their next heist
and decide to rob the diner they're currently having breakfast in, not
worrying about the unexpected danger they're about to encounter which
they think is unlikely, after describing the relatively low amount of
security associated with a diner in contrast to a bank.
'Pulp Fiction' harbours many thrashing scenes of vibrant energy that it
not only found a place as the critic's darling of the year in which it
was released, but it earned Tarantino and his writing partner Roger
Avery an Oscar and made a healthy return at the box office for its
studio.  With public acceptance as strong as that of the critic's, 'Pulp
Fiction' is perhaps smarter than any film of its generation.  It's a
motion picture which is timeless not because of its controversy but
because of the enduring nature of criminals bent on self destruction
which everyone loves to see.

Author
DOUG FURNEY
     Profanity, violence, and pop culture references abound in  PULP
FICTION, the new movie by Quentin Tarantino.  Some may know Tarantino
as the screenplay writer for TRUE ROMANCE or the writer-director of the
critically acclaimed RESERVOIR DOGS, and just like those previous
efforts the heart of PULP FICTION lies in Tarantino's brilliantly
written conversations among the various characters.  Dialogue fuels
PULP FICTION to vividly show the contemptible lives of each character.
Tarantino has the gift of propelling the movie along through the
spoken word, whereas lesser creators might rely solely on action,
violence or special effects.  You should note that the movie is shown in
a non-linear time structure reminiscent of the critically acclaimed
independent film MYSTERY TRAIN, but this should not be an annoyance
because the movie is basically a series of three related vignettes
that individually add up to one great movie.
     Quentin Tarantino has gathered a diverse cast of actors to depict
the sordid and irredeemable characters that make up PULP FICTION.  John
Travolta and Bruce Willis both deliver surprisingly distinguished
performances.  Other notable cast members include Uma Thurman, Harvey
Keitel, Tim Roth, Amanda Plummer, Ving Rhames, Christopher Walken, Eric
Stoltz, and  Rosanna Arquette.  However, the best performance in the
movie goes to Samuel L. Jackson who portrays the mobster Jules
Winnfield.  The character of Jules has some of the film's funniest and
most amusing lines, and he is the only character for whom there appears
to be a chance of redemption at film's end.  Although Jules may on
first impression seem to be a stereotypical 1970's black gangster
from   SUPERFLY, SHAFT or THE MACK; he is the only character who even
begins to develop a conscience and question his lifestyle.  From Lance
the drug dealer to Marcellus Wallace the mob boss,  PULP FICTION is
chock full of interesting characters portrayed by high profile actors
who each deliver effective performances.  Even in brief cameo
appearances Christopher Walken and Harvey Keitel are memorable.
     The main focus during most of the movie is the interaction between
Vincent Vega (John Travolta) and Jules Winnfield (Samuel L. Jackson),
two mob hitmen.  Their conversations, however trivial, are always
engaging and full of humor.  Vincent and Jules discuss everything from
European fast food to foot massages.  One of their more interesting
conversations takes place while they are cleaning up the interior of a
car in which Vincent accidentally shot a backseat passenger in the
face, creating something of a mess.
     Another high profile character is that of the double-crossing
boxer Butch Coolidge (Bruce Willis).  Butch is on the run from mob boss
Marcellus Wallace (Ving Rhames) and goes through quite an ordeal
retrieving a beloved family heirloom.  The scene involving Butch,
Marcellus and a couple of DELIVERANCE-inspired characters named Zed and
Maynard is rather brutal and most definitely disturbing.  Another
shocking scene involves Vincent Vega and Marcellus' wife Mia (Uma
Thurman).  After Mia overdoses on heroin that she mistakes for cocaine,
Vincent rushes her frantically to the house of his drug dealer, Lance
(Eric Stoltz).  The scene in which Vincent administers a shot of
adrenaline, through her breast plate, straight to Mia's heart is full
of tension and agonizing suspense.
     The stories that make up PULP FICTION are degenerate tales that
show tragic, pathetic and wasted lives.  Although this is true, the
movie is also very funny.  With this paradox Tarantino has produced a
movie that could be generally characterized as grotesque or Gothic.  In
this regard Tarantino is walking a thin line.  For the same reason that
one person finds the film amusing another person could see it as a
horrible tragedy.  Many parts of the movie conjure laughter and horror
often within the same scene, yet it is this ambiguity that makes the
film even more interesting.
     I highly recommended this film by one of today's brightest young
writers and directors.  Quentin Tarantino may not have reached the
status of Martin Scorcese, Oliver Stone, or Francis Ford Coppola as far
as their abilities for visual impact, but no one weaves a tale quiet
like Tarantino.  His abilities as a storyteller are cleverly enhanced
by his brilliant use of dialogue.  To Tarantino words are more
important than action, violence, sex, and other means aimed at shock
and controversy.  Tarantino will most likely be around awhile,
hopefully continuing with first rate work.  I would also encourage the
viewing of the Tarantino scripted TRUE ROMANCE and Tarantino's
directorial debut in RESERVOIR DOGS.  If you liked these two then
chances are you will enjoy his latest effort PULP FICTION, and if you
have never seen any of these films give one a chance.

Author
Jason Overbeck
When critics offer their favorite or best film choices they usually
serve Citizen Kane or Casablanca, two great films.  I'll throw Pulp
Fiction and I'll do so for the same reason they pick theirs.  They
venture beyond any conventional idea of what a modern movie can be and
what it can accomplish.  They end up transcending film and making it
their own, creating waves of wannabes, none of which can even compare. 
I love Pulp Fiction.  It is the film that made me love films more than I
thought was possible.  I can't imagine seeing a better film.  
Pulp Fiction tells three stories of bad people and like Kane it is
nonlinear, making even the simplest story seem somewhat confusing.  The
first story is about a hitman taking his bosses wife out to diner, the
second about a boxer who fails to fall even though he was paid to, and
the third story has an accidental killing leaving a dead body to be
disposed of.  All the stories are told with height of humor and
outrageous flare for filmmaking.  It also has the best dialogue I have
ever heard, crackling with profanity and explodes with joy of language. 
The only writer whose dialogue I could compare Pulp Fiction to is David
Mamet, and that is a big credit to Quentin Tarantino and Roger Avery
(they won Best Original Screenplay).
The film is also famous for reviving and creating careers.  John
Travolta had no career, other than Look Who's Talking 4, and was brought
back to the Hollywood lime light by his appearance in this film.  Sam
Jackson and Uma Thurman had small careers that were catapulted into
stars by Pulp Fiction.  Quentin Tarantino was made into a household name
by the success of this film.
Pulp Fiction is an energetic and amazingly exciting film.  It teases us
with passages of humor and then explodes with deftly timed flashes of
extreme violence, and plays with our anticipation.  Tarantino knows
where we will expect to see violence and blood and he wonderfully
prolongs the dialogue passages before them to make the violence (which
isn't as graphic as everyone thinks) seem more excessive and shocking. 
Take the scene where hitmen will kill a few kids that ripped of their
boss, we get a long, funny discussion of foot massages before they enter
the apartment and more conversation about fast food after.
There is also endless speculation about Pulp Fiction.  There is a
briefcase that contains something "beautiful" that emits a yellow glow,
but we never find out what it is.  Is there something biblical in the
case?  Jules (Sam Jackson) keep referencing a bible quote, and Marsellus
Wallace (Rhames as the boss) has a Band-Aid on the back of his head.  Is
that covering the forbidden 666?  Why do Jules and Vincent (Travolta)
have their lives saved?  All these speculations are fun but
unanswerable.  The point is Pulp Fiction is the most talked about film
in several years.
I love every scene in Pulp Fiction.  There isn't a line I would word
differently or a camera shot I would edit out.  Each actor delivers a
wonderful, well-measured performance without going over the top.  This
is the kind of film that begs for you to ask what the favorite scene, or
character, or story is.  A film that energizes you to the point where
you feel you must talk about it, for the sake of having it linger on in
your head.
The only way to see Pulp Fiction is on the big screen.  Most people have
only seen it on their televisions and that is a shame.  If you must
watch it on TV please see t on wide screen video and not pan and scan. 
Also please avoid the network broadcast of Pulp Fiction, it has a TVMA
rating and is director approved but is horribly edited and absent of
content.  Like reading Shakespeare modernized and robbed of its poetic
attributes.

Author
Scott Renshaw
Starring:  John Travolta, Samuel L. Jackson, Bruce Willis, Uma Thurman,
           Ving Rhames, Tim Roth, Amanda Plummer, Harvey Keitel.
Screenplay/Director:  Quentin Tarantino.
     According to all evidence, PULP FICTION is going to be one of
those movies that turns people into incarnations of Beavis and
Butthead; either it "sucks" or it "kicks ass," apparently with no
tenable middle ground.  This of course is the natural course of things
for films as unique as PULP FICTION.  The same thing happened with
NATURAL BORN KILLERS already this year, as proponents and detractors
exchanged ad hominem volleys.  Quentin Tarantino's stunning sophomore
effort deserves better.  It is the kind of film, imperfect though it
may be, which should inspire discussion about how exciting the medium
can be.  There are more moments in this one film which awed me to
silence than in every other 1994 release combined, and while its faults
may not allow it to stand as the year's best film, it's certainly
close.
     PULP FICTION is divided into segments telling interlocking tales
about a group of shady characters.  Vincent Vega (John Travolta) and
Jules Winfield (Samuel L. Jackson) are enforcers for crime boss
Marsellus Wallace (Ving Rhames).  Vincent is asked by Marsellus to take
care of his wife Mia (Uma Thurman) while he is out of town, leading to
an adventurous night out.  Marsellus, meanwhile, is arranging for boxer
Butch Coolidge (Bruce Willis) to throw a fight, which Butch doesn't do
when he figures he can clean up by winning.  Then, in an
out-of-sequence flashback, Vincent and Jules deal with an inadvertent
killing, and a pair of madly in love robbers (Tim Roth and Amanda
Plummer) in a diner.
     This is what must be said about PULP FICTION: few films in the
last fifteen years have left me so charged with the pure gonzo thrill
of movie-making.  Has there been a more erotically charged conversation
than that between Vincent and Mia at a gaudy 50's-style burger joint?
Has the flushing of a toilet ever caused such a combination of laughter
and suspense.  And has any scene caused an entire audience to squirm
quite so violently as a spectacular moment involving an overdose victim
and a six inch hypodermic needle?  Quentin Tarantino refuses to let any
moment just sit there; relationships between characters crackle with
intensity, and darkly comic punch lines are spit out like bullets.  I
left PULP FICTION feeling as though I had not simply watched a movie,
but *experienced* one.  I was exhausted.
     However, it would be a mistake to suggest that there is nothing to
PULP FICTION but its visceral impact.  Tarantino does not place his
characters in a universe of amoral anarchy; as RESERVOIR DOGS first
indicated, he is fascinated with loyalty and moments of improbable
selflessness.  Two such moments provide the moral backbone of PULP
FICTION.  In one, Bruce Willis' Butch makes a decision which could cost
him his life--even if he is successful--all to save another human being
from torture.  In the other, Samuel L. Jackson's Jules undergoes a sort
of conversion, and in the course of explaining his actions gives one of
the most stunning speeches in recent memory.  Both are showcases for
career performances.  Willis is better than his previous work had ever
so much as hinted at, while Jackson delivers what is quite simply the
best performance in an American film this year.  It is at these moments
when PULP FICTION, for all its frantic energy, reveals its real
message:  even in a world this violent, salvation is possible.
     The only real problem with PULP FICTION is a significant lag
between the marvelous middle segment and Jackson's tour-de-force
monologue.  It consists of the appearance of a low-key fixer named
Winston Wolf (Harvey Keitel) who helps Vincent and Jules clean up after
their car gets unexpectedly messy, and it never really develops the
momentum that the Travolta/Thurman and Willis/Rhames segments do.  But
Tarantino brackets that lull with such sheer cinematic glory, that the
sour taste doesn't linger.  PULP FICTION is violent, profane and filled
with addicts, racists and killers.  At the same time, it may be one of
the most moral stories the big screen has seen in years.  That
Tarantino was able to pull off that little maneuver says as much about
his talent as a dozen Palmes d'Or.

Author
David Landers
RATING: **** out of **** - 9.5 out of 10.0
CAST: Samuel L. Jackson (Jules Winnfield), John Travolta (Vincent Vega),
Bruce Willis (Butch Coolidge), Ving Rhames (Marsellus Wallace), Uma
Thurman (Mia Wallace), Tim Roth (Pumpkin), Amanda Plummer
(Honey Bunny), Eric Stoltz (Lance), Christopher Walken (Captain Koons),
Quentin Tarantino (Jimmie), Harvey Keitel (Winston Wolf), Angela Jones
(Esmarelda Villalobos), Maria de Medeiros (Fabienne), Brett (Frank Whaley)
DIRECTOR: Quentin Tarantino
CERTIFICATION: R (USA) for excessive violence, language, graphic
images, and drug use 
YEAR OF PRODUCTION: 1994
ACADEMY AWARDS: Best Original Screenplay (Tarantino), 
ACADEMY AWARD NOMINATIONS: Best Picture, Best Director (Tarantino),
Best Actor (Travolta), Best Supporting Actor (Jackson), Best
Supporting Actress (Thurman), Best Film Editing (Sally Menke), 
PULP FICTION, Quentin Tarantino's anxiously awaited and superb follow-up
to RESERVOIR DOGS, is absolutely and without a doubt progressing as one of
the most talked about, loved, and hated films of all-time.  In all
fairness, it should be noted that those who love this film greatly
outnumber those who hate it.  As if RESERVOIR DOGS wasn't perfect,
Tarantino went ahead and improved on perfection by creating PULP FICTION,
a fast-paced, hard talking, roller coaster ride of a movie that combines
violence and extraordinary dialogue in a seemingly perfect way. 
Every major character in this film is represented by a terrific acting
performance by the actor.  To begin with, the two hit men: Vincent Vega
(John Travolta) and Jules Winnfield (Samuel L. Jackson).  These two
characters work together perfectly, and the performances by each actor are
nearly perfect.  Travolta, in fact, is still trying to get out of the
Vincent Vega role.
If these two characters were not enough, there's the struggling boxer
Butch Coolidge (Bruce Willis), the two small-time criminals Pumpkin (Tim
Roth) and Honey Bunny (Amanda Plummer), the big man in charge Marsellus
Wallace (Ving Rhames) and his attractive young wife Mia (Uma Thurman), and
the "problem solver" himself, The Wolf (Harvey Keitel).  These are just
the major characters.  
Smaller roles, but equally terrific, are handed to Jimmie (Quentin
Tarantino), a young married man who gets caught up in some
serious gangster business, Lance (Eric Stoltz), the far-out drug dealer,
as well as Maynard (Duane Whitaker) and Zed (Peter Greene), two
hillbillies who are the men "behind" (no pun intended for those of you
who have seen this) a very disturbing scene towards the end of the film.
The film interweaves three stories that, at first, seem to be nothing
alike but later prove to be very critical to each other.  The film begins
with Pumpkin and Honey Bunny in a small coffee shop discussing their
recent robberies and hold-ups.  The two quickly decide to hold up the
coffee shop, unknowing of what lies ahead.
After this, the film focuses for some time on Vincent and Jules and their
hit man lifestyle.  Utilizing the films unforgettable dialogue, the two
men discuss such things as hamburgers and foot massages before they bust
into an apartment to terrorize the occupants.  The two men were sent to
the apartment to recover a mysterious briefcase for their boss, Marsellus
Wallace.  After basically toying with the men, especially the unfortunate
Brett (Frank Whaley), Vincent and Jules complete their mission and recover
the briefcase.  This is not before a man jumps out from a bathroom with a
.357 "hand cannon", shooting at the two gangsters.  He somehow completely
misses them, leading Jules to cite divine intervention.  This is also the
basis for more of the now-famous Tarantino dialogue.
The film then shifts to focus on boxer Butch Coolidge and his boxing
escapades.  Butch was ordered to take a fall in his latest fight, but when
he does not, Marsellus vows to find him, wherever he is, and make sure
that Butch is not able to enjoy his new fortune. 
Vincent, meanwhile, has the honor of taking Marsellus' wife, Mia, out on a
date while the big man is out of town.  Vincent, obviously, is rather
nervous about this, especially after hearing the tale about a man who was
thrown out of a window for supposedly giving Mia a foot massage.  After
their date, which seems to rather smoothly, things take a turn for the
worst at the hands of Vincent's high-priced heroin, dubbed a
"monster" by Lance.
Each story continually progresses, and new and amazing events
occur.  Eventually, the stories all meet each other in the end, with
Pumpkin and Honey Bunny holding up the restaurant, which happens to
contain both Vincent and Jules.
PULP FICTION is definitely one of the best films of the decade, and
possibly of all-time.  Along with its superb dialogue, action, writing,
directing, and acting, this film will not only latch onto you, but it
proves that it does not want to release you until it has sunk its claws
completely into you.  And with most fans of this movie, this is proved to
be a rather easy task, although at times the graphic images,
violence, and language may seem a bit overpowering.  Surely, Quentin
Tarantino's fame was greatly escalated by this film, and he proves not to
be one who will fade from existence very soon.


Author
Jules N. Binocula
     No doubt many will say that PULP FICTION is one of the year's
greatest films--how many will say it's one of cinematic history's
most offensive?  How many have the guts?
     It's not offensive because the word "nigger" must have been used
69 times (and that was by the African-Americans in the film), nor is it
offensive because Bruce Willis empties a round of automatic weapon fire
into a bloody John Travolta as Travolta exits a bathroom with his
defecatory reading material.
     Nor is it offensive because Uma Thurman snorts heroin by mistake
and is dragged (nose bloody and white scum pouring from her mouth) onto
the floor of a house of low-voltage substance abusers to have Travolta
ram a 6-inch syringe through her breast to snap her out of a coma with
prescription adrenaline.
     Nor is it offense because a bald, fat, chocolate parody of a
Blaxploitation crime godfather is draped over a gymnast's padded
exercise horse with a red rubber ball stuffed into his mouth and raped
anally by a Southern-accented security guard.  Nor is offensive because
the film's director himself appears in an extended cameo to remind his
two lead actors that his house is "not a dead nigger storage"
facility.
     When 19th Century British iconoclast and literary prankster, Oscar
Wilde was testifying in his own defense for writing offensive
literature--he was asked, "Mr. Wilde, do you feel that work was
immoral?," he answered, "It was worse than that.  It was badly
written."
     PULP FICTION is not offensive because it tries to be cute.  It's
offensive because it's a ponderously soulless sophomorically bloody
film-school abortion, masquerading as a parody of cliche of a
postmodernist cartoon.  Call it what you will, but call it "baaad!"
     It's probably good manners for your humble reviwer to summarize
the plot of this warped and anaemic ego-trip:
     A black hitman and a white hitman murder three Causcasian
burger-eating adolescents living in a cheesy la-apartment (one of whom
bears a frightening resemblance to an uncredited Jerry Seinfeld (believe
it or not).
     They take a black hostage because the black assassin feels that,
although they were shot at close range by the Seinfeld-look-alike, the
bullets miraculously only put holes in the wall behind them because God
intervened to save their candy a*ses.
     However, what God gives, he quickly takes away: Travolta, the
white hitman, shoots the black hostage in the face from the front seat
of their getaway car when the black hitman hits a bump in the road.
     Next, they visit Quentin Tarantino, playing a Caucasian suburban
Southern California husband married to an African-American nurse who's due
home any minute, and would be deeply offended to see a "dead nigger
stored in the garage."
 
     To make a 2-hour-and-44-minute story shorter:
     Harvey Keitel shows up in black tie and tuxedo to order the hitmen
to put the corpse in the trunk, and clean the car to remove blood and
"small pieces of brain and skull" with household disinfectants.
     During all the unfolding excitement, the white hitman finds time
to take his (black) boss's white wife out dancing in a 50's retro
drive-in juke joint before she overdoses but survives after heroic
medical instructions from Travolta's neurotic (white) drug dealer.
     After that, Bruce Willis, playing a white boxer who kills his
opponent and tries to leave town before slicing a greasy pawn-shop
owner with his own samarai sword while rescuing the same (black) boss
from passive sodomy by a sado-masochistic racist looking for some
forcible homosexual amusement in the back room.
     There's probably another subplot, but you get the idea.
     Here's the big secret: QT is way over his head!  The film is an
(amazingly) sometimes humorous non-stop rip-off of every 20th Century
media cliche imaginable--complete with no context, no soul, no
pacing, no proportion, and no ideas!
     Be sure to see it--if you want to encourage independent
filmmakers to continue their anal-ysis of modern culture!
     (Making this film was obviously a ploy to drive up the price of
silver used in all the release prints/)

Author
Raymond Johnston
Dir: Quentin Tarentino
Starring: John Travolta, Samuel L. Jackson, Uma Thurman,
          Christopher Walken, Tim Roth, Eric Stoltz, Amanda Plummer,
          Roseanne Arquette, Harvey Keitel and Bruce Willis.
Screenplay: Quentin Tarentino and Roger Avery
Executive Producers include Danny DeVito
     There is an axiom that directors who have a big hit with their
debut have a big bomb with their second film.  From Orson Welles to
Spike Lee and John Singleton, this has held true.  Quentin Tarentino,
who came out of nowhere to write and direct RESERVOIR DOGS has broken
that rule with PULP FICTION.  It shows no signs of being the work of a
young man struggling with too many ideas.  Instead it is the polished
work of an accomplished film maker.
     As the title suggests, the film is about the world of gangsters
and gamblers that populated the cheap paperback fiction of the
thirties, forties and fifties, updated to a somewhat nebulous modern
time.  Just as SHORT CUTS interweaved various highbrow story threads
into one somewhat convoluted and far reaching story, PULP FICTION
takes themes from Cornell Woolrich and Raymond Chandler, mixes them
with Seventies' TV and Fifties' movies into intertwining stories of
deals gone wrong and criminals searching for some bigger meaning to it
all.
     Surprisingly enough, John Travolta, considered by many to be a
has-been, or a one-hit wonder turns in the performance of his career.
As the hapless hitman who figures into all the story threads he holds
the film together.  Between jobs he rattles on constantly to his
cohort Samuel L. Jackson about the glories of life in Amsterdam and
eroticism of foot massages.  Jackson tends more towards quoting TV
shows and Blaxploitaion movies.  Travolta and Jackson encounter the
rest of the all star cast, most of whom really just have glorified
cameos in their own little story segments.
     The various story segments each reflect different elements of pulp
fiction genres- fixed fights, double crossed deals, dance contests,
narcotics, weird perversions, and mob hits.  Each story is really an
homage to a famous crime film, THE KILLERS , THE SET-UP and KISS ME
DEADLY, to name just a couple.  Even samurai films get a slight nod.
The stories quickly swings from surreal to absurd to profound, and no
story is  without its share of media savvy humor.  Almost all the
characters seem obsessed with the media.  Hitman Travolta points out
the difference between a Marilyn Monroe look alike and a Mamie van
Doren look alike.  Jackson quotes the "Kung Fu" series.
     Tarantino's ear for dialogue and eye for sight gags is priceless.
The little throw away lines and obtuse arguments that the characters
constantly get into are what make this sometimes ultra-violent film
worthwhile.  Just when you peg a scene as being routine, some odd comic
mishap sends the plot off in another direction.  Tarentino also uses an
odd non-linear narrative structure that leaves some important
unanswered questions, and then fills in the gaps by returning to some
plot threads, sort of like Kubrik's structure in THE KILLING, but not
quite as rigorous.  This structure works by keeping the pace steady and
building some suspense.
     While the film is, at close to two and a half hours, never boring
and a great success, it has a few minor faults.  A bizarre S& M scene
doesn't really match the offhandedly flip tone of the rest of the
film.  Another is that some of the highly hyped actors in the film have
little more than a cameo.  Uma Thurman is really just in two scenes,
Harvey Keitel in one, and Chris Walken has just a few lines.  And while
Tarentino scores big as both writer and director, he scores much less
an actor.  With actors of the caliber of Chris Walken doing bits,
Tarentino just doesn't hold up in his acting scene.
     Those minor quibbles aside,  it is easy to see why PULP FICTION
won the Palm d'or at Cannes.  It delivers on the potential that the
low-budget RESERVOIR DOGS promised.

Author
Jason Wallis
Starring John Travolta, Samuel L. Jackson, Uma Thurman, Harvey Keitel, Tim
Roth, Amanda Plummer, Maria de Medeiros, Ving Rhames, Eric Stoltz, Rosanna
Arquette, Christopher Walken, Bruce Willis and Quentin Tarantino
Directed by Quentin Tarantino
     When Quentin Tarantino made "Pulp Fiction", he was not only making the
greatest film of the 90s; he was also making what I believe to be the most
influential movie of all time.  But before you send me hate-mail for not
giving that title to "Citizen Kane", hear me out.
     Much like "Citizen Kane", "Pulp Fiction" has changed movie making
forever.  But I think the latter has had a tad more impact.  "Pulp Fiction"
has actually ushered in a new era of film making.  It has altered the way
films will be viewed.  "Fiction" has spawned so many imitations, I've lost
count.  Sure, some have been excellent ("Bound" and "The Usual Suspects"
spring immediately to mind), but any serious movie-goer recognizes "Pulp
Fiction" as the original neo-noir of the 90s.  In this review, I hope to
change all the people's minds who have criticized it for it's excessive
profanity and violence (which, by the way, isn't really that graphic).  
     The most brilliant aspect of Tarantino's masterpiece is the
screenplay.  It is filled with so much classic dialogue (the "Quarter
Pounder with Cheese" speech will go down in history), it should be required
reading for any film student, if it isn't already.  
     The story (told in unorthodox non-linear format) centers around three
main episodes, all of which eventually intertwine.  The first, titled
"Vincent Vega and Marcellus Wallace's Wife", deals with a very loaded John
Travolta (I forgot to mention the cool heroin shoot-up sequence) taking Mia
Wallace (a star-making performance by Uma Thurman), his bosses wife, out on
a date to a cool 50s restaurant called Jack Rabbit Slim's.  They talk for a
while (with the occasional "uncomfortable silence"), mostly about a guy
called Tony Rocky Horror.  After giving Marcellus' new bride a foot
massage, he was thrown off a building and into a greenhouse, giving him a
"speech impediment".  They also partake in a cool dance contest and end up
twisting to the Chuck Berry classic "You Never Can Tell".  I won't reveal
the rest of the story, but I'll definitely say that it turns out to be a
real bummer of a night, despite the cool trophy they win.
     The second story (the least of the three but still four stars) stars
Bruce Willis (proving he can play someone other than John McClain in the
"Die Hard" flicks) as boxer Butch Coolidge.  Previously in the film (like I
said, it's told in non-linear form), he had made a deal with Marcellus
Wallace that he would take a fall in a match.  As it turns out, he not only
doesn't take the fall, but he ends up actually killing his opponent.  He
takes a cab to his half-witted girlfriend's apartment, and to make a
long story short, ends up going back to his own place to retrieve a gold
watch, sort of a family heirloom explained by Christopher Walken in a
hilarious flash-back sequence.  On his way home, he bumps into (literally)
Marcellus.  The two winde up prisoner to two hillbilly sex murderers, which
results in the infamous "Gimp" scene, which is very reminicent of the
"squeal like a pig!" scene from "Deliverance".
     The last (and best, in my opinion) of the episodes features John
Travolta (again) and Samuel L. Jackson (in the best performance of any
supporting actor ever) as two slightly off-kilter hitmen trying to rid
themselves of a bloody car.  They seek help with a friend of Jackson's
(played by the Q-man himself), desperately in need of a Stress Ball.  They
end up calling a "cleaner" of sorts, played by the god among men Harvey
Keitel, to help them out.  In the end, the story brilliantly loops around
itself, actually ending where it began.
     If you haven't already seen the film (or even if you have, for that
matter), I suggest you invest your money in a copy of the letterbox
collectors edition.  It features two previously unreleased scenes and the
original film restored how it was originally meant to be seen.  Earlier
today, I bought this version and watched it a few hours ago.  What the
pan-and-scan did to this movie is inexcusable.  That version cut out, like,
half the movie.  What I have missed in the past years of viewing this flick
is amazing.  For instance, when Travolta and Jackson are in the apartment
near the end, the widescreen version allows you to see that several things
on the walls make crosses.  This might help explain the divine intervention
that takes place.  Just a theory...
     One of the things that pisses people off so much about this movie is
that Tarantino borrowed alot of scenes from other movies (i.e. "Psycho"
"Kiss Me Deadly", "Deliverance", etc.).  But why shouldn't he?  It's not
like he out-right and blatantly stole.  Give the guy a break.
     In case you haven't already noticed, I believe "Pulp Fiction" is a
supremely excellent film and one of the best of all time (up there with
such greats as "Casablanca" and "The Godfather").  Trust me, you will not
see a better film come out of the 90s.  And besides, it's one hell of a
ride.
Note: If anyone knows how I could get a "Bad Motherfucker" wallet,
please e-mail me.  Any help would be greatly appreciated.

Author
Brian Koller
"Pulp Fiction" was the follow-up to Quentin Tarantino's
second film as both Director and Screenwriter, "Reservoir
Dogs".  Although "Dogs" is an even better film, "Pulp
Fiction" benefitted from the momentum of "Dogs", a cast
with greater name recognition, and less graphic (although
still shocking to the innocents) violence.
"Pulp Fiction" has an ensemble cast with multiple
overlapping storylines.  Samuel L. Jackson and John
Travolta are well-dressed hitmen, working for kingpin
Ving Rhames.  Travolta also plays a dubious escort
to Rhames' wife Uma Thurman.  Bruce Willis is a boxer
who renegs on an argreement with Rhames to fix a fight.
Willis' girlfriend is childlike Maria de Medeiros.
Christopher Walken has a great cameo as Willis' father.
Harvey Keitel gets Jackson and Travolta out of a fix,
Eric Stoltz is a jaded drug dealer, Roseanna Arquette
his multiply-pierced wife.  Finally, Tim Roth and
Amanda Plummer are plotting to rob a restaurant,
whose patrons include Jackson and Travolta.
"Pulp Fiction" is a terrific film.  The script is loaded
with clever dialogue (it drags only during Willis' bathroom
conversation with de Medeiros).  There is much action.  The
direction is original.  The cast (except for Tarantino, who
should stay behind the camera) is excellent.  Samuel L. Jackson
probably gives the best performance, but it was Travolta
who revived his career and received a Best Actor nomination.
"Pulp Fiction" uses obscenities freely, has much violence,
and glamorizes criminal lifestyles.  But it is wrong to
downgrade a film because one disagrees with its values.
The film takes the viewer on a wild ride, and the action
is not offensive, but unpredictable and cartoonish.
The characters aren't credible, but they become real
through the outstanding dialogue.  There is much comic relief
to break the tension, which is most intense during Thurman's
overdose.
Some of the cast from "Dogs" reappears here, including
Keitel, Roth and Tarantino.  The Tarantino trademarks of
using forgotten pop oldies as a soundtrack, shuffling scenes
out of chronological order, and inserting plot-unrelated
conversations about pop culture, are also repeated.
Although "Pulp Fiction" was too controversial for the
staid Academy, it won the Oscar for Best Original Screenplay
(Tarantino and Roger Avary).  Tarantino was nominated for
Best Director and Best Picture, while Jackson and Thurman
picked up Supporting nominations.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Author
Jeffrey Graebner
     An odd trend in movies this year is good filmmakers paying loving
tribute to bad art.  Earlier this month, director Tim Burton's tribute
to one of the worst filmmakers of all-time was released.  Now with PULP
FICTION, another hot young director, Quentin Tarantino, has paid
tribute to some of the worst that literature has to offer.  The result
is an intriguing, unusual film that eventually is hurt by the fact that
it emulates the lurid novels that inspired it a bit *too* well.
     Tarantino's screenplay intertwines four different stories
(credited to Tarantino and Roger Avery) only occasionally allowing
those stories to intersect.  The film occasionally shifts, sometimes
awkwardly, to follow different stories.  One story involves a couple of
robbers/lovers (Tim Roth and Amanda Plummer)  who decide to try and
simplify their lives with a switch to robbing restaurants instead of
liquor stores.  Another story follows a hitman named Vincent (John
Travolta) as he is required to take his boss' wife Mia (Uma Thurman)
out to dinner while the boss (Ving Rhames) is out of town.  A third
story is centered around boxer Butch Coolidge (Bruce Willis) who fails
to take a fall as ordered after being paid off by Rhames.  Finally, the
fourth story involves Vincent and his partner Jules (Samuel L. Jackson)
as they try to clean up the messy results of a hit gone wrong.
     The film does not attempt to tell these stories in a linear
manner.  The film is broken up into "chapters" much like a real pulp
novel.  It even includes cheesy chapter titles that are used to
indicate the shift to a different storyline.  The movie even doubles
back on itself a number of times instead of allowing events to unfold
in a chronological order.  Like the novels that inspired the film, PULP
FICTION largely abandons all the standard rules of structure and orders
the scenes for maximum impact.
     The cast works largely as an ensemble and the performances are
without exception very good.  Of course, pulp novels are not known for
strong characterizations, but the actors manage to create some very
distinctive and performances even with relatively little to work with.
Many critics have discussed this film as being a "comeback" for John
Travolta and it certainly is his strongest performance in a long time.
His character is written as kind of a dim bulb, but Travolta manages to
give him some distinctive personality.  During one of the film's best
sequences, Travolta and Thurman participate in a dance contest.  It
really comes through to the audience that he is having an absolutely
terrific time sending up his earlier career.
     Besides Travolta, Bruce Willis is probably the actor with the most
screen time in this movie.  Willis is another actor who often does not
receive the respect that he deserves.  He has occasionally made some
poor choices when selecting movies, but his performances are frequently
very strong.  Without strong direction he does sometimes mug a bit too
much, but Tarantino does a good job keeping him under control here.
     Samuel L. Jackson is the actor who may end up benefiting the most
from this film.  He is given the most serious and most well-developed
character here and gives a career making performance.  Jackson has been
solid in a number of high profile films (including JURASSIC PARK), but
this is the meatiest, most interesting performance he has given to
date.
     Two of the film's most enjoyable performances are essentially
cameos.  Like in his earlier screenplay for TRUE ROMANCE, Tarantino
wrote one wonderful, brief scene for Christopher Walken.  I won't ruin
anything by trying to describe his monologue, but it provides the
film's biggest laugh.  Harvey Keitel is also allowed to shine in a
small, but pivotal role as a "problem solver".  The role is basically a
variation on Keitel's earlier role in POINT OF NO RETURN, but he plays
it to the hilt.  Other entertaining cameo performances are given by
Eric Stoltz, Rosanna Arquette, and even Tarantino himself.
     Tarantino's biggest strength as a writer tends to be dialog.  This
movie is packed with clever conversation.  A number of cliched
situations are livened up by the unusually sharp and memorable dialog.
Tarantino perfectly captures the vulgar, profanity-laced dialog that is
standard in pulp novels.  Tarantino is also very good at capturing on
film the lurid and vulgar tone of the individual scenes from a pulp
novel.  The scenes all *feel* like they came from an old-fashioned dime
novel.
     Despite the film's many strengths, it eventually is hurt by its
very subject matter.  The movie is full of interesting parts and
pieces, but none of it ever really adds up to much of anything.  This
is generally true of the novels that inspired the film as well, but
this leaves the viewer with kind of an empty feeling.
     Another problem is that pulp novels tend to be best in small
doses.  The constant vulgarity and graphic violence tends to wear thin
after a while and to become kind of tedious.  At over two and a half
hours in length, PULP FICTION goes on a bit too long.  It is helped
somewhat by the shifts from story to story, but it still becomes a bit
headache inducing after a while.
     One of the best ways to judge a film is to look at how well the
movie accomplishes what it sets out to do and PULP FICTION really does
succeed very well by this test.  It is a *very* accurate recreation of
the pulp novels that inspired it with all of their strengths and
weaknesses.  The movie goes on a bit long and it consists of a lot of
interesting parts that never really come together all that well, but it
is still a very interesting and worthwhile effort.

Author
Laurence Mixson
Review by Laurence Mixson (venom8@hotmail.com)
Starring John Tavolta, Samuel L. Jackson, Uma Thurman, Bruce Willis,
Ving Rhames, Harvey Keitel, Tim Roth, Amanda Plummer, Quentin Tarantino,
and Christopher Walken.
        Artistically speaking, Pulp Fiction was hands-down the best movie of
1994, and I'd even say it was the best movie of the '90's.  Yet it's
also one of the most misunderstood films out there.
        Pulp Fiction only won two oscars at the 1994 Academy Awards, although
it was nominated for many, including Best Picture and Best Actor. The
two oscars it did manage to walk away with were for Best Original
Screenplay(to Roger Avery and Quentin Tarantino) and Best Supporting
Actor(to Samuel L. Jackson.) It's main competition, Forrest Gump, got
away with the rest.
        Yet Pulp Fiction was a better film than Forrest Gump. Now don't get me
wrong here; I loved Forrest Gump, it was a **** film. It was a
wonderfully orignal comedy/drama that genuinely made you feel for an
unlikely hero. But that's about all it was: an original movie that was
fun to watch. Pulp Fiction contained, and stood, for a whole lot more.
        To get to the plot: there's nothing conventional about Pulp Fiction,
including the plot structure. The movie is comprised of three stories,
but it's not an anthology, because the stories connect. Not only that,
but they cut off and then start back up again at different times, in
between segments. Pulp Fiction doesn't follow in a chronological order,
either, and in one bizarre side effect of this, a character is shot dead
in the middle of the film yet returns again at the finale, because of
the film's odd continuity.
        The four stories are rather simple enough: the first one deals with two
lovers(Roth, Plummer) who decide to rob a restaurant. The second one
concerns two hitman(Travolta, Jackson), as they go to "finish up some
business" with their boss' estranged business assosciates. The third is
about a boxer(Willis) who upsets that same boss(Rhames) after refusing
to take a fall in a match the boss bet heavily on. There's more to each
story than that, of course, but I only listed the opening scenes of each
segment.
        The first story is the weakest and takes up the least screeen time; the
two lovers, known only as Pumpkin and Honey Bunny(their pet names for
one another) basically just sit around and talk about the robbery. That
is, until they meet up with the hitmen later. Those two hitmen, named
Vincent(Travolta) and Jules(Jackson), have the most interesting story
going for them, and it takes up the most screen time and is divided into
several parts. Their scene opens with them driving to a hit in their
car. Later scenes include Vincent taking his boss' wife out while the
boss, name Marcellus Wallace, is out of town(it's a favor for the boss)
and, uh "cleaning up" after a hilarious incidence that occurs in his
car. I'll touch on that one later...
        The boxer segment deals with Butch Coolidge(Willis), who is payed by
Marcellus to take a fall in the 5th round. He refuses to do so, and
actually winds up killing his opponent in the ring. He escapes, and
later he and the Marcellus have an intersting run-in with two hicks in a
pawn shop.
        The best thing about Pulp Fiction is that each of these stories are
deeper and more complex than they sound on the surface: for one thing,
they're very realistic. When Vincent and Jules are driving to the place
where they're to carry out their hit, they don't act like the "cool"
hitmen you always see on the screen. They discuss what hamburgers are
called in France(Royales with Cheese)and such. These conversations are
not only hilarious in their content but are funny because of who's
saying it.
        The most humorous scene, the one I mentioned earlier, occurs when
they're transporting a guy named Marvin back to their boss, Marcellus.
Vincent accidentally shoots Marvin in the face, and blows his head into
little pieces all over him, Jules, and the car. In a panic, they rush to
a friend's house, Jimmy(Tarantino)who contacts Wintson Wolf(Keitel) to
come and help them clean up the gore and dispose of the car. This scene
works, in terms of humor, not only because of everyone's dialogue as
they work, but because everyone, including Marcellus, is panicking and
trying to hurry the clean-up simply because Jimmy's wife comes home
soon, and she would divorce Jimmy if she saw those people in her home.
The sight of all these tough hitmen and cold-blooded killers panicking
over a woman coming home is way too funny.
        Pulp Fiction was heavily criticized when it came out for being violent,
but I actually thought the violence was very subdued, and nothing
compared to most movies these days. When people are shot, it's almost
always off camera and rarely bloody. Sure, poor Marvin has his head
blown off, but all that's shown is the blood splattered everywhere, not
the actual act.  Die Hard with a Vengeance or Desperado were both a
hundred times more violent than Pulp Fiction, as I'm sure anyone who's
seen these films will agree, yet no one whined and complained about
those pictures.
        So what's the deal with Pulp Fiction? Basically, if you're into
comedies, dramas, action pictures, arthouse films, or something a little
different, then Pulp Fiction will work for you, because it manages to
take the best elements from all of these genres and combine them into
one great big spectacle of a motion picture. So go to the nearest video
store and rent a copy if you haven't seen it yet. Or even if you have.
Trust me, you won't be dissapointed.
